South Dakota, session 2026, HB1208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 36-16-13 be AMENDED:
36-16-13. Any person, partnership, company, corporation, or association that for
a fixed sum, price, fee, percentage, or other consideration, undertakes or offers to
undertake with another to plan, lay out, supervise, install, make additions, make
alterations, or make repairs, in the installation of wiring, apparatus, or equipment for
electric lights, heat, or power, shall must be licensed by the State Electrical Commission.
The commission shall issue a license, as a physical card and as an electronic equivalent,
to a qualified person under this section in the class defined under § 36-16-2 for which the
person applies after successful completion of the examination required by the commission.
The license issued under this chapter must bear a security marking approved by the
commission.
The commission shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, establishing fees
for the examination and the application required under this section, as well as for the
replacement of a license card. The commission may charge, or may authorize a third party
that administers the examination to charge, each person an examination fee not to exceed
one hundred fifty dollars per examination or reexamination. The application fee may not
exceed one hundred dollars per occurrence. The fee to replace a lost or stolen license card
may not exceed thirty-five dollars per occurrence.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.